North Dakota statutes. TITLE 30.1 Uniform Probate Code
CHAPTER 30.1-33 Jurisdiction of Court Concerning Trusts [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27]

30.1-33-01. (7-201)
District court jurisdiction of trusts. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

30.1-33-02. (7-202)
Trust proceedings — Venue. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

30.1-33-03. (7-203)
Trust proceedings — Dismissal of matters relating to foreign trusts. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

30.1-33-04. (7-204)
District court jurisdiction of litigation involving trusts and third parties. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

30.1-33-05. (7-205)
Proceedings for review of employment of agents and review of compensation of trustee and employees of trust. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.

30.1-33-06. (7-206)
Trust proceedings — Initiation by notice — Necessary parties. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2007, ch. 549, § 27.